District of Columbia statutes.
47-129

Revenues credited to General Fund.

After June 28, 1944, any revenue now required by law to be credited to the District of Columbia and the United States in the proportion that each contributed to the activity or source from whence such revenue was derived shall be credited wholly to the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-129.
1973 Ed., § 47-130a.